Louisiana, session 2026, SB83.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:419.5 and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§419.5. Human trafficking prevention; training in elementary and secondary
schools
A. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each city, parish, or other
local public school board shall adopt a policy on human trafficking victim
identification and reporting and require each school to designate at least one
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
employee to receive annual advanced training on human trafficking. The
designated school employee shall be a school counselor, mental health
professional, or a school administrator.
B. The training instruction shall be administered to designated
employees by live, in-person training or by an online course. The state
Department of Education, in conjunction with the governor's office of human
trafficking prevention, shall provide information on available training
curriculums to school boards. The training instruction shall at minimum define
the crime of human trafficking, differentiate between the types of human
trafficking, recognize common indicators of human trafficking, discuss barriers
and best practices for victim identification, reinforce reporting requirements,
and review resources and services that are available to human trafficking
victims in this state.
C. A record of the designated employees and the completion of the course
shall be retained by each school. Each city, parish, or other local public school
board shall document and verify that each school is in compliance with this
Section.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Human trafficking prevention training, R.S. 17:419.5.
* * *
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
Section 2. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 46:51(16), the introductory paragraph
of 51(16)(b), 2161, and 2161.1 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:51(16)(c) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§51. Duties of the department
* * *
(16) Make care coordination and advocacy services available for child
victims of child sex human trafficking and advocacy services available for child
and youth victims of human trafficking as follows:
* * *
(b) Based on the needs of the child or youth and the child's his family,
advocacy services may include:
* * *
(c) Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to
this Section:
(i) "Child" means a person who is under the age of eighteen.
(ii)"Human trafficking" means the perpetration or attempted
perpetration of the trafficking of children for sexual purposes, pursuant to R.S.
14:46.3, trafficking related to commercial sexual activity, pursuant to R.S.
14:46.2, or debt bondage or labor trafficking, pursuant to R.S. 14:46.2.
(iii) "Youth" means an individual who is at least eighteen years of age
but is not more than twenty-one years of age.
* * *
§2161. Human trafficking victims; services plan; children
A. With respect to children found to be victims of human trafficking, the
Department of Children and Family Services, in conjunction with the Louisiana
Department of Health, shall develop a plan for the delivery of a child is eligible for
specialized services to for victims of human trafficking.
(1) The child shall be reported to the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services reporting hotline, in accordance with Children's Code
Article 610(A)(4)(b). The department shall make available care coordination
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
and advocacy services pursuant to R.S. 46:51(16).
(2) State agencies with custodial care of children shall ensure that a child
in their care who is determined to be a victim of human trafficking shall have
full access to care coordination and advocacy services.
B. Such plan services for victims of human trafficking shall include
provisions for: those services provided in R.S. 46:2161.1.
(1) Identifying victims of human trafficking in Louisiana.
(2) Assisting victims of human trafficking with applying for federal and state
benefits and services to which they may be entitled.
(3) Coordinating the delivery of health, mental health, housing, education, job
training, child care, victims' compensation, legal, and other services to victims of
human trafficking.
(4) Preparing and disseminating educational and training programs and
materials to increase awareness of human trafficking and services available to
victims of human trafficking among local departments of social services, public and
private agencies and service providers, and the public.
(5) Referring child victims to the appropriate community-based services for
victims of human trafficking.
(6) Assisting victims of human trafficking with family reunification or return
to their place of origin, if the victims so desire.
BC. In developing the plan, a comprehensive strategy to prevent human
trafficking and address the needs of human trafficking victims, the governor's
office of human trafficking prevention shall coordinate with the departments
Department of Children and Family Services and the office of juvenile justice,
and shall work together with such other state and federal agencies, public and private
entities, and other stakeholders as they deem appropriate.
CD.(1) Each private entity that provides services to victims pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking
prevention and to the Department of Children and Family Services an annual report
on their operations including information on the services offered, geographic areas
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
served, the number of persons served, and individual status updates on each person
served. This information shall not include the name, address, or other identifying
information of the person served. The governor's office of human trafficking
prevention shall compile the data from all of the reports submitted pursuant to the
provisions of this Subsection and shall provide this information to the legislature on
or before the first day of February each year.
(2) Each statewide and local law enforcement entity that investigates cases
of human trafficking or related sexual offenses and that provides services to victims
pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of
human trafficking prevention and to the Department of Children and Family Services
an annual report on their operations including information on type of investigation,
outcome of the investigation, and any services offered to victims, and demographic
information related to the case and services offered and any additional information
as requested.
(3) Each district attorney who prosecutes cases of human trafficking or
related sexual offenses or who provides services to victims pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking prevention
and to the Department of Children and Family Services an annual report on their
operations including the prosecuting agency's name, parish, disposition of case,
statute under which the offense was prosecuted, sentencing date, restitution ordered,
restitution paid, value of assets from civil asset forfeiture, and any services offered
to victims, and any additional information as requested.
§2161.1. Human trafficking victims services plan; adults
A. With respect to any person referred to the Department of Children and
Family Services who is eighteen years of age or older and who is found to be a
victim of human trafficking in which the trafficking activity included commercial
sexual activity or any sexual conduct constituting a crime under the laws of this state,
the department shall refer the person shall be provided information on any
treatment or specialized services for human trafficking victims or referred to
the appropriate department, agency, or entity to provide the person with the
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
following:
(1) Assistance in applying for federal, and state, and other benefits and
services to which the victim may be entitled.
(2) Coordination of the delivery of health care, mental health care, housing,
education, job training, child care, victims' compensation, legal, and other services
available to victims of human or trafficking, including sex trafficking.
(3) Referral to the appropriate community-based services to the extent that
such services are available.
(4) Assistance with family reunification or returning to the victim's victim
to their place of origin, if the victim so desires.
B. In coordinating these services for the victim, the department The
governor's office of human trafficking prevention shall work together with such
other state and federal agencies, public and private entities, and other stakeholders
as they deem appropriate to implement a comprehensive strategy to prevent
human trafficking and address the needs of human trafficking victims.
C.(1) Each private entity that provides services to victims pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking
prevention and to the Department of Children and Family Services an annual report
on their operations including information on the services offered, training or
certifications received specific to human trafficking, geographic areas served, the
number of persons served, and individual status updates on each person served. This
information shall not include the name, address, or other identifying information of
the person served. The governor's office of human trafficking prevention shall
compile the data from all of the reports submitted pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection and shall provide this information to the legislature on or before the first
day of February each year.
(2) Each statewide and local law enforcement entity that investigates cases
of human trafficking or related sexual offenses and that provides services to victims
pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of
human trafficking prevention and to the Department of Children and Family Services
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
an annual report on their operations including information on the type of
investigation, the outcome of the investigation, and any services offered to victims,
and any demographic information related to the case and services offered, and any
additional information as requested.
(3) Each district attorney who prosecutes cases of human trafficking or
related sexual offenses or who provides services to victims pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking prevention
and to the Department of Children and Family Services an annual report on their
operations including the prosecuting agency's name, parish, disposition of case,
statute under which the offense was prosecuted, sentencing date, restitution ordered,
restitution paid, value of assets from civil asset forfeiture, and any services offered
to victims, and any additional information requested.
Section 3. Children's Code Art. 610(A)(4)(b) and (E)(4) are hereby amended and
reenacted and Children's Code Art. 508.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 508.1. Multidisciplinary investigative team; care coordination
A. Care coordination teams shall comply with the rules of
multidisciplinary investigative teams in accordance with this Part.
B. Care coordination teams are responsible for the investigation and
multidisciplinary coordination of child trafficking cases, accepted by the team
in compliance with the team’s protocols. Each team shall develop and institute
interagency protocols in accordance with Article 510 of this Part.
C.(1) A care coordination team may obtain all information necessary to
perform its official duties from any public agency, department or other
organization, including material otherwise made confidential or privileged. Any
confidential or privileged material or verbal information obtained by a team
member during an investigation shall be disclosed only as necessary to other
team members, and shall not be disclosed to any agency or individual not
represented on the multidisciplinary team unless otherwise required by law.
(2) Any public or private department, agency, or organization may share
with a care coordination entity all information that is made confidential by law
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
when it is needed to provide or secure services under this Chapter. Confidential
information shared with or provided to a care coordination entity remains the
property of the providing organization.
D. "Care coordination entity" or "care coordination team" means
entities that are authorized by Department of Children and Family Services
through a procurement contract to provide care coordination services and
specialized multidisciplinary teams for victims of human trafficking, pursuant
to R.S. 46:51.
* * *
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. * * *
(4) Reports to the department shall be made as follows:
* * *
(b) If a report involves alleged sex human trafficking, all mandatory
reporters shall report via the hotline telephone number to the department regardless
of whether there is alleged parental or caretaker culpability.
* * *
E. * * *
(4) The department shall communicate as soon as possible all reports
involving alleged child victims of sex human trafficking to the Louisiana State
Police for referral to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for investigation
or other action as appropriate.
* * *
Section 4. Implementation of the provisions of the introductory paragraph of R.S.
46:51(16) and the introductory paragraph of R.S. 46:51(16)(b) as amended and reenacted by
this Act and R.S. 46:51(16)(c) as enacted by this Act is subject to the appropriation of funds
by the legislature for this purpose.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 8 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 83 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.